Rhode Island, session 2025, SB612.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-53-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-53 entitled "Low and
Moderate Income Housing" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-53-12. Annual report.
(a) The Rhode Island housing corporation established pursuant to chapter 55 of title 42 (the
“corporation”) shall collect data on the number of Section 8 Housing Choice Vouchers, as
authorized by 42 U.S.C. § 1437(f) (“vouchers”), that are received and utilized by the public housing
authorities (PHA) and agencies.
(b) The office of housing and community development (OHCD) The department of
housing shall prepare a report (“report”) on an annual basis to the general assembly, the housing
resources commission, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, and the
division of statewide planning, and the secretary of housing. The report required by this section
shall be made available on the OHCD department of housing website for a period of at least three
(3) years, and shall be deemed to be a public record. The report shall be due on or before March 1
April 15 of each year, commencing in the calendar year 2023.
(c)(b) The annual report required by this section shall contain the following information
for the twelve-month (12) calendar period covered by the report commencing January 1, 2022,
through December 31, 2022, and annually thereafter on an aggregated and disaggregated basis by
each public housing authority:
(1) The total amount of fees in lieu collected by each municipality from developers in lieu

of development of low- and moderate-income housing as defined in § 45-24-46.1, the projects that
were provided funding by the fees, the amounts allocated to the projects, and the number of units
created. The information required by this subsection shall be provided by all municipalities directly
to the executive office of housing.
(2) The number of unfunded vouchers that result either due to cost of rent or due to an
unavailability of housing units amount of "leasing potential" as defined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development. The information required by this subsection shall
be provided by all public housing authorities or agencies directly to the office of housing and
community development (OHCD) department of housing.
(3) The total number of vouchers received and utilized by all public housing authorities in
the state during the preceding calendar year.
(4) The administrative fees received and utilized by the public housing authorities to
administer the vouchers.
(d)(c) As used herein, the term “public housing authority and agency” means and includes
any public housing authority or agency established under chapter 25 of this title or chapter 26 of
this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001357/SUB A
========
LC001357/SUB A - Page 2 of 3